Utah statutes.
78B-5-407.   Asserting and defending a foreign-money claim.

(1)  A claimant may assert a claim in a specified foreign money.  If a foreign money is not asserted, the claimant makes a claim for a judgment in United States dollars.

(2)  An opposing party may allege and prove the claim is in whole or in part for a different money than that asserted by the claimant.

(3)  Any party may assert a defense, set-off, recoupment, or counterclaim in any money without regard to the money of other claims.

(4)  The determination of the proper money of the claim is a question of law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

